Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 4 O.S. 2021, Section 43, is
amended to read as follows:
The board of county commissioners of any county with a
population of two hundred thousand (200,000) or more according to
the last Federal Decennial Census may regulate or prohibit the
running at large of dogs within said county, and cause such dogs as
may be running at large to be impounded and disposed of as otherwise
provided for by law or sold to discharge the costs and penalties
provided for the violation of such prohibition and the expense of
impounding and keeping the same for such sale; and may also provide
for the erection of all needful pens, pounds and buildings for the
use of said county at any place within said county. It shall be the
Req. No. 13981 Page 1

duty of the board of county commissioners of any county undertaking
the regulation and taxation of dogs in said county under this act to
establish and enforce rules governing the same, and they shall enter
into a definite cooperative agreement with the sheriff of said
county prescribing said rules and regulations and the manner and
terms of enforcement thereof, and for the financing and compensation
therefor. The board of county commissioners may also regulate and
provide for taxing the owners and harborers of dogs, and authorize
the humane killing or disposal of dogs, found at large, contrary to
any ordinance regulating the same. Any person, firm or corporation
who violates any rule or regulation made by such board of county
commissioners under the authority of this act shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided by the laws of this
state in any court of competent jurisdiction, provided that in the
case of continuing offenses, each day on which the offense occurs
shall constitute a separate offense.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-13981 JL 12/04/25





Req. No. 13981 Page 2